Maine, session 132, LD467.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §285, sub-§14, as enacted by PL 2009, c. 456, §1, is amended to
read:
14. Employees and retirees eligible for Medicare. Notwithstanding subsection 7, if
an active employee eligible for Medicare elects to enroll in Medicare, the State shall pay
100% of the employee’s share of the premiums for Medicare Part B until such time as the
employee enrolls as an eligible retiree pursuant to this section. Notwithstanding subsection
7, the State shall pay 100% of a retiree's share of the premiums for Medicare Part B for
those retirees not eligible for benefits under the Social Security Act as defined in section
19002, subsection 7 whose base annual state pension benefit on or after January 1, 2026 is
projected to be less than or equal to the maximum amount of the retirement benefits that is
subject to the cost-of-living adjustment under section 17806 being paid to retired state
employees.